Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2105
Powers.

(1) A development
corporation shall have all the powers granted to corporations organized under
the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, except
that it shall not give security for any loan made to it by members unless
all loans to it by members are secured ratably in proportion to unpaid balances
due.

(2) The restriction in subsection (1) of this section shall in no manner
be construed so as to prohibit a development corporation from making unsecured
borrowings from the federal Small
Business Administration.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 5, p. 304;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 205;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 267.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.